Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5728.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 31-23.3-3 and 31-23.3-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-23.3
entitled "Nontransparent Windshields and Windows" are hereby amended to read as follows:
31-23.3-3. Rules and regulations authorized — Administrator of the division of motor
vehicles Allowable levels of light transmittance.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall establish rules and regulations
to provide standards and tests to measure the percentage of reflective and transmittance of light.
Front side windows and front side wing vents of every vehicle shall have a measured light
transmittance of not less than thirty-two percent (32%), as measured with a light transmittance
meter having an accuracy of plus or minus three percent (3%) or better, when sun screening material
has been applied to such windows.
(b) The right and left side windows behind the driver, and the rearmost window, shall have
a measured light transmittance of not less than thirty-two percent (32%), as measured with a light
transmittance meter having an accuracy of plus or minus three percent (3%) or better, when sun
screening material has been applied to such windows.
(b)(c) Any person, firm, corporation, or other entity installing such a sunscreen device on
a motor vehicle shall provide and affix a label to the front window not to exceed one and one-half
(1½) square inches in size, which contains the installer’s name and the percentage of light
transmittance. Facing the motor vehicle from the outside, the label shall be placed in the lower left

corner of the front window.
31-23.3-4. Exemptions.
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:
(1) Motor vehicles manufactured with windshields and window glass areas equipped in
accordance with specifications of 49 CFR 571.205 as authorized by 15 U.S.C. § 1407.
(2) Motor vehicles owned or leased by federal, state and local law enforcement agencies.
(3) The use of nontransparent or sunscreen material or window application on motor
vehicles which has a total visible light transmittance of not less than seventy percent (70%)
measured perpendicular to the surface of the glass on the windshield and side windows immediately
adjacent to the right and left of the operator’s seat, the side windows immediately to the rear of the
operator’s seat and the front passenger seat or on the rear window if the vehicle is equipped with
two (2) outside mirrors, one on each side, adjusted so that the driver has a clear view of the highway
behind the vehicle. The windows behind the driver on any truck, motor bus, trailer, mobile
manufactured home, or multipurpose passenger vehicle, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations
Title 49, Section 571.3, as amended, provided the vehicle is equipped with outside mirrors on the
left and right-hand sides, which are so located as to reflect to the driver a view of the highway for
a distance of at least two hundred feet (200') to the rear of such vehicle; and
(4) The use of any transparent material limited to the uppermost six inches (6") along the
top of the windshield, provided the strip does not encroach upon the driver’s direct forward viewing
area as more particularly described and defined in applicable Federal Motor Vehicle Safety
Standards. The rearmost window or windows, provided the vehicle is equipped with outside mirrors
on the left and right-hand sides of the vehicle, which are so located as to reflect to the driver a view
of the highway for a distance of at least two hundred feet (200') to the rear of such vehicle.
(5) Motor vehicles not required to be registered in this state.
(6) The use of sunscreen material on windows behind the driver in trucks, buses, trailers,
mobile homes, campers, multipurpose vehicles, charter buses, funeral service vehicles, or
limousines, provided that the vehicle is equipped with two (2) outside mirrors, one on each side, if
those mirrors meet federal standards adjusted so the driver has a clear view of the highway behind
the vehicle.
(7)(6) A motor vehicle registered in this state in the name of a person, or the person’s legal
guardian, who has an affidavit signed by a physician or an optometrist licensed to practice in this
state that states that the person has a physical condition that makes it necessary to equip the motor
vehicle with a sunscreening device which may exceed federal standards. The division of motor
vehicles, upon application of the individual, which shall include the affidavit, shall issue a sticker
LC001949 - Page 2 of 4

to be applied to the driver’s side window to identify this exemption.
(8)(7) Any motor vehicle, registered and garaged within this state, whose sole purpose is
to provide executive security to persons within this state. The owner(s) of the vehicle shall first
seek and obtain written permission from the local police chief where the vehicle is garaged and
registered before the waiver is granted.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001949
========
LC001949 - Page 3 of 4